Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.160

Governor's powers not affected—Revocation of paroles granted by board.

This chapter shall not limit or circumscribe the powers of the governor to commute the sentence of, or grant a pardon to, any convicted person, and the governor may cancel or revoke the parole granted to any convicted person by the board. The written order of the governor canceling or revoking such parole shall have the same force and effect and be executed in like manner as an order of the board.

[ 1999 c 143 s 27; 1955 c 133 s 17. Prior: 1939 c 142 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 4, part; RRS s 10249-4, part.]